California, session 20252026, AB86.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 60209 is added to the Education Code, to read:60209. On or before July 1, 2028, the state board shall adopt instructional materials for health education for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, pursuant to the requirements of this article and in alignment with the health curriculum framework adopted by the state board in 2019.